Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0256.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 16o. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.271 Property E Fraudulently issuing or selling domestic securities 10 750.272 Property G Sale of fraudulent stock of foreign corporations 10 750.273 Property E Obtaining signature with intent to defraud 10 750.274 Property E Purchasing or collecting on fraudulent financial document 10 750.276 Property G Obtaining signature or promise of vendee of grain to sell at fictitious price 4 750.277 Pub trst G Sale or transfer of note of vendee of grain to sell at a fictitious price 4 750.278 Property G Issuing or delivering fraudulent warehouse receipt 5 750.279 Property G Fraudulent disposal of entrusted property 4 750.280 Property E Gross fraud or cheat at common law 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.282 750.282(2)(b) Pub ord G Fraudulently damaging or using property of utility in amount over $500 4 750.282a Property E Illegally selling or transferring product or service of electric service provider or natural gas provider to another person 5 750.300 Pub ord G Killing or injuring animal to defraud insurance company 2 750.300a(1)(a) Property G Food stamp fraud of $250 or less ï¿½ second offense 5 Property G Food stamp fraud of $250 or less ï¿½ third or subsequent offense 10 750.300a(1)(b) Property E Food stamp fraud of more than $250 to $1,000 5 Property E Food stamp fraud of more than $250 to $1,000 ï¿½ subsequent offense 10 750.300a(1)(c) Property E Food stamp fraud of more than $1,000 10 750.303 Pub ord H Gaming 2 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 750.313 Pub ord H Gambling in stocks, bonds, or commodities 2 Sec. 16s. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.377a(1)(a) Property D Malicious destruction of personal property involving $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10 750.377a(1)(b) Property E Malicious destruction of personal property involving $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 750.377b Property F Malicious destruction of fire/police property 4 750.377c Property E School bus ï¿½ intentional damage 5 750.378 Property F Malicious destruction of property ï¿½ dams/canals/mills 4 750.379 Property F Malicious destruction of property ï¿½ bridges/railroads/ locks 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 750.380(2) Property D Malicious destruction of building involving $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10 750.380(3) Property E Malicious destruction of a building involving $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 750.382(1)(c) Property E Malicious destruction of plants or turf involving $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 750.382(1)(d) Property D Malicious destruction of plants or turf involving $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10 750.383a 750.383a(1) Property E Malicious destruction of utility equipment or utility infrastructure component 5 750.386 Property E Malicious destruction of mine property 20 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 750.387(5) Property E Malicious destruction of a tomb or memorial involving $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 750.387(6) Property D Malicious destruction of a tomb or memorial involving $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10 750.392 Property E Malicious destruction of property ï¿½ vessels 10 750.394(2)(c) Person F Throwing or dropping dangerous object at vehicle causing injury 4 750.394(2)(d) Person D Throwing or dropping dangerous object at vehicle causing serious impairment 10 750.394(2)(e) Person C Throwing or dropping dangerous object at vehicle causing death 15 750.395(2)(c) Property E Damaging or destroying research property with a value between $1,000 and $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.395(2)(d) Property E Damaging or destroying research property with a value of $20,000 or more or 2 or more prior convictions 5 750.395(2)(e) Person E Damaging or destroying research property resulting in physical injury 5 750.395(2)(f) Person D Damaging or destroying research property resulting in serious impairment of body function 10 750.395(2)(g) Person C Damaging or destroying research property resulting in death 15 750.397 Person D Mayhem 10 750.397a Person D Placing harmful objects in food 10 750.405 Pub saf E Inciting soldiers to desert 5 750.406 Pub saf E Military stores ï¿½ larceny, embezzlement or destruction 5 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 255 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into 1 ï¿½law.